Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 1 General Provisions

45-14-1.
Election.

There shall be a Commissioner of Insurance who shall be elected at the same time and in the same manner as the Governor is elected.

History.

Ga. L. 1872, p. 80, § 6; Code 1873, § 98; Code 1882, § 98; Civil Code 1895, § 203; Civil Code 1910, § 235; Code 1933, § 40-1401; Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 25.

45-14-2.
Bond.

The Commissioner of Insurance shall give a bond for the sum of $20,000.00 subject to the same rules and regulations as the bond of the Secretary of State.

History.

Laws 1843, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1034; Code 1863, § 94; Code 1868, § 92; Code 1873, § 99; Code 1882, § 99; Civil Code 1895, § 204; Civil Code 1910, § 236; Code 1933, § 40-1402; Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 25.

Cross references.

Official bonds generally, Ch. 4, T. 45, C. 4.

45-14-3.
Duties as Safety Fire Commissioner.

The Commissioner of Insurance shall be the Safety Fire Commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-14-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 25; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1089, § 2/SB 343; Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 6/SB 462.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, deleted “and the Industrial Loan Commissioner” following “Commissioner”. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 25, redesignated former Code Section 45-14-3 as present Code Section 45-14-4.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 10/SB 462, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall apply to all installment loan agreements entered into on and after July 1, 2020.”

45-14-4.
Compensation of Commissioner and office employees.

The Commissioner of Insurance shall be compensated in the amount and manner provided in Code Sections 45-7-3 and 45-7-4. He shall also be reimbursed for actual transportation costs while traveling by public carrier, the legal mileage rate for use of a personal automobile, and the actual cost of lodging and meals while away from his office on official state business as provided in Code Section 45-7-20.

The Commissioner of Insurance shall fix the compensation of the employees of his office including the employees of all divisions and units, by whatever name called, over which the Commissioner of Insurance has jurisdiction, except that any employees under the merit system shall be compensated as provided by the laws, rules, and regulations relative to such system. Employees shall also be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

History.

Laws 1826, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1027; Code 1863, § 1572; Code 1868, § 1634; Code 1873, § 1640; Code 1882, § 1640; Civil Code 1895, § 282; Civil Code 1910, § 317; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 78; Code 1933, § 40-1404; Ga. L. 1941, p. 240, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 127, § 1; Ga. L. 1947, p. 673, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 575, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 96, § 3; Code 1981, §

45-14-3

; Code 1981, §

45-14-4

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 25; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 45.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 25, provided for the repeal of this Code section, effective April 3, 1996. For present comparable provisions, see Code Section 45-14-5.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 25, redesignated former Code Section 45-14-3 as Code Section 45-14-4.

45-14-5.
Seal.

The Commissioner of Insurance and Safety Fire Commissioner shall have an official seal for each office of such design as he or she shall select with the approval of the Governor.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-14-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 25; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 87/HB 24; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1089, §§ 3, 4/SB 343; Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 7/SB 462.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, substituted “Insurance and Safety Fire Commissioner” for “Insurance, Safety Fire Commissioner, and Industrial Loan Commissioner” near the beginning. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 25, effective April 3, 1986, repealed former §

45-14-5

, which dealt with the office, residence, and office hours of the Comptroller General and was based on Laws 1826, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1027; Code 1933, § 40-1403.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 10/SB 462, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall apply to all installment loan agreements entered into on and after July 1, 2020.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

45-14-6 through 45-14-9.

Redesignated by Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 25 as §§

45-14-20

through 45-14-23, respectively.

45-14-10.
[Repealed] Preparation of statement of account, etc., upon leaving office; declaring of vacancy in office and appointment of successor by Governor.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 103; Code 1868, § 101; Code 1873, § 109; Code 1882, § 109; Civil Code 1895, § 217; Civil Code 1910, § 251; Code 1933, § 40-1406; repealed by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1152, § 4, effective July 1, 1984.